Florida, session 2026, SB432.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSection 2 of this act may be cited as âMegâs 30 Law.â 31 Section 2.âSection 569.216, Florida Statutes, is created to 32 read: 33 569.216âProhibition on possessing, selling, delivering, or 34 giving nitrous oxide; penalties; exceptions.â 35 (1)âIt is unlawful for any dealer who is licensed or 36 permitted under this chapter, or a dealerâs agent or employee, 37 to possess, sell, possess with intent to sell, deliver, or give, 38 directly or indirectly, nitrous oxide on or from the dealerâs 39 licensed premises. A dealer or a dealerâs agent or employee who 40 violates this subsection commits a felony of the third degree, 41 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 42 (2)âThis section does not apply to a grocery store or 43 supermarket, as licensed or permitted by the Department of 44 Agriculture and Consumer Services, but does apply to a 45 convenience business, as defined by s. 812.171. 46 (3)âThis section does not prohibit the possession, sale, 47 delivery, or giving of a finished food product in which nitrous 48 oxide is used solely as a propellant. 49 (4)âThe Department of Business and Professional Regulation 50 shall adopt rules regarding the possession, sale, delivery, or 51 giving of nitrous oxide to prevent the use of nitrous oxide for 52 inducing a condition of intoxication. Such rules may address 53 products containing nitrous oxide and finished food products in 54 which nitrous oxide is used solely as a propellant. 55 Section 3.âEffective July 1, 2026, paragraph (c) of 56 subsection (1) of section 893.03, Florida Statutes, is amended 57 to read: 58 893.03âStandards and schedules.âThe substances enumerated 59 in this section are controlled by this chapter. The controlled 60 substances listed or to be listed in Schedules I, II, III, IV, 61 and V are included by whatever official, common, usual, 62 chemical, trade name, or class designated. The provisions of 63 this section shall not be construed to include within any of the 64 schedules contained in this section any excluded drugs listed 65 within the purview of 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.22, styled âExcluded 66 Substancesâ; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.24, styled âExempt Chemical 67 Preparationsâ; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.32, styled âExempted 68 Prescription Productsâ; or 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.34, styled âExempt 69 Anabolic Steroid Products.â 70 (1)âSCHEDULE I.âA substance in Schedule I has a high 71 potential for abuse and has no currently accepted medical use in 72 treatment in the United States and in its use under medical 73 supervision does not meet accepted safety standards. The 74 following substances are controlled in Schedule I: 75 (c)âUnless specifically excepted or unless listed in 76 another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 77 preparation that contains any quantity of the following 78 hallucinogenic substances or that contains any of their salts, 79 isomers, including optical, positional, or geometric isomers, 80 homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs, esters, ethers, and 81 salts of isomers, homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs, 82 esters, or ethers, if the existence of such salts, isomers, and 83 salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical 84 designation or class description: 85 1.âAlpha-Ethyltryptamine. 86 2.â4-Methylaminorex (2-Amino-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2 87 oxazoline). 88 3.âAminorex (2-Amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline). 89 4.âDOB (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 90 5.â2C-B (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 91 6.âBufotenine. 92 7.âCannabis. 93 8.âCathinone. 94 9.âDET (Diethyltryptamine). 95 10.â2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine. 96 11.âDOET (4-Ethyl-2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine). 97 12.âDMT (Dimethyltryptamine). 98 13.âPCE (N-Ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine) (Ethylamine 99 analog of phencyclidine). 100 14.âJB-318 (N-Ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate). 101 15.âN-Ethylamphetamine. 102 16.âFenethylline. 103 17.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-hydroxyamphetamine. 104 18.âIbogaine. 105 19.âLSD (Lysergic acid diethylamide). 106 20.âMescaline. 107 21.âMethcathinone. 108 22.â5-Methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine. 109 23.âPMA (4-Methoxyamphetamine). 110 24.âPMMA (4-Methoxymethamphetamine). 111 25.âDOM (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 112 26.âMDEA (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine). 113 27.âMDA (3,4-Methylenedioxyamphetamine). 114 28.âJB-336 (N-Methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate). 115 29.âN,N-Dimethylamphetamine. 116 30.âParahexyl. 117 31.âPeyote. 118 32.âPCPY (N-(1-Phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine) (Pyrrolidine 119 analog of phencyclidine). 120 33.âPsilocybin. 121 34.âPsilocyn. 122 35.âSalvia divinorum, except for any drug product approved 123 by the United States Food and Drug Administration which contains 124 Salvia divinorum or its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and 125 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, if the existence of such 126 isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the 127 specific chemical designation. 128 36.âSalvinorin A, except for any drug product approved by 129 the United States Food and Drug Administration which contains 130 Salvinorin A or its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of 131 isomers, esters, and ethers, if the existence of such isomers, 132 esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific 133 chemical designation. 134 37.âXylazine, except for a xylazine animal drug product 135 approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and 136 the use of which conforms to the approved application or is 137 authorized under 21 U.S.C. s. 360b(a)(4). The manufacture, 138 importation, distribution, prescribing, or sale of xylazine for 139 human use is not subject to this exception. 140 38.âTCP (1-[1-(2-Thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine) 141 (Thiophene analog of phencyclidine). 142 39.â3,4,5-Trimethoxyamphetamine. 143 40.âMethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone). 144 41.âMDPV (3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone). 145 42.âMethylmethcathinone. 146 43.âMethoxymethcathinone. 147 44.âFluoromethcathinone. 148 45.âMethylethcathinone. 149 46.âCP 47,497 (2-(3-Hydroxycyclohexyl)-5-(2-methyloctan-2 150 yl)phenol) and its dimethyloctyl (C8) homologue. 151 47.âHU-210 [(6aR,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2 152 methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol]. 153 48.âJWH-018 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 154 49.âJWH-073 (1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 155 50.âJWH-200 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1 156 naphthoyl)indole). 157 51.âBZP (Benzylpiperazine). 158 52.âFluorophenylpiperazine. 159 53.âMethylphenylpiperazine. 160 54.âChlorophenylpiperazine. 161 55.âMethoxyphenylpiperazine. 162 56.âDBZP (1,4-Dibenzylpiperazine). 163 57.âTFMPP (Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine). 164 58.âMBDB (Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine) or (3,4 165 Methylenedioxy-N-methylbutanamine). 166 59.â5-Hydroxy-AMT (5-Hydroxy-alpha-methyltryptamine). 167 60.â5-Hydroxy-N-methyltryptamine. 168 61.â5-MeO-MiPT (5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine). 169 62.â5-MeO-AMT (5-Methoxy-alpha-methyltryptamine). 170 63.âMethyltryptamine. 171 64.â5-MeO-DMT (5-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine). 172 65.â5-Me-DMT (5-Methyl-N,N-dimethyltryptamine). 173 66.âTyramine (4-Hydroxyphenethylamine). 174 67.â5-MeO-DiPT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine). 175 68.âDiPT (N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine). 176 69.âDPT (N,N-Dipropyltryptamine). 177 70.â4-Hydroxy-DiPT (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine). 178 71.â5-MeO-DALT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diallyltryptamine). 179 72.âDOI (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 180 73.âDOC (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 181 74.â2C-E (4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 182 75.â2C-T-4 (4-Isopropylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 183 76.â2C-C (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 184 77.â2C-T (4-Methylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 185 78.â2C-T-2 (4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 186 79.â2C-T-7 (4-(n)-Propylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 187 80.â2C-I (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 188 81.âButylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 189 methylaminobutyrophenone). 190 82.âEthcathinone. 191 83.âEthylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone). 192 84.âNaphyrone (Naphthylpyrovalerone). 193 85.âDimethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N-dimethylcathinone). 194 86.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N-diethylcathinone. 195 87.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-propiophenone. 196 88.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-bromopropiophenone. 197 89.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-propiophenone-2-oxime. 198 90.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylcathinone. 199 91.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylmethcathinone. 200 92.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylethcathinone. 201 93.âBromomethcathinone. 202 94.âBuphedrone (alpha-Methylamino-butyrophenone). 203 95.âEutylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 204 ethylaminobutyrophenone). 205 96.âDimethylcathinone. 206 97.âDimethylmethcathinone. 207 98.âPentylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 208 methylaminovalerophenone). 209 99.âMDPPP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 210 pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 211 100.âMDPBP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 212 pyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 213 101.âMOPPP (Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 214 102.âMPHP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone). 215 103.âBTCP (Benzothiophenylcyclohexylpiperidine) or BCP 216 (Benocyclidine). 217 104.âF-MABP (Fluoromethylaminobutyrophenone). 218 105.âMeO-PBP (Methoxypyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 219 106.âEt-PBP (Ethylpyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 220 107.â3-Me-4-MeO-MCAT (3-Methyl-4-Methoxymethcathinone). 221 108.âMe-EABP (Methylethylaminobutyrophenone). 222 109.âEtizolam. 223 110.âPPP (Pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 224 111.âPBP (Pyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 225 112.âPVP (Pyrrolidinovalerophenone) or 226 (Pyrrolidinopentiophenone). 227 113.âMPPP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 228 114.âJWH-007 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 229 115.âJWH-015 (1-Propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 230 116.âJWH-019 (1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 231 117.âJWH-020 (1-Heptyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 232 118.âJWH-072 (1-Propyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 233 119.âJWH-081 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole). 234 120.âJWH-122 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole). 235 121.âJWH-133 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-(2-methylpentan 236 2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene). 237 122.âJWH-175 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthylmethyl)indole). 238 123.âJWH-201 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 239 124.âJWH-203 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole). 240 125.âJWH-210 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole). 241 126.âJWH-250 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 242 127.âJWH-251 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole). 243 128.âJWH-302 (1-Pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 244 129.âJWH-398 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole). 245 130.âHU-211 ((6aS,10aS)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3 246 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1 247 ol). 248 131.âHU-308 ([(1R,2R,5R)-2-[2,6-Dimethoxy-4-(2-methyloctan 249 2-yl)phenyl]-7,7-dimethyl-4-bicyclo[3.1.1]hept-3-enyl] 250 methanol). 251 132.âHU-331 (3-Hydroxy-2-[(1R,6R)-3-methyl-6-(1 252 methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-1-yl]-5-pentyl-2,5-cyclohexadiene 253 1,4-dione). 254 133.âCB-13 (4-Pentyloxy-1-(1-naphthoyl)naphthalene). 255 134.âCB-25 (N-Cyclopropyl-11-(3-hydroxy-5-pentylphenoxy) 256 undecanamide). 257 135.âCB-52 (N-Cyclopropyl-11-(2-hexyl-5-hydroxyphenoxy) 258 undecanamide). 259 136.âCP 55,940 (2-[3-Hydroxy-6-propanol-cyclohexyl]-5-(2 260 methyloctan-2-yl)phenol). 261 137.âAM-694 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole). 262 138.âAM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 263 139.âRCS-4 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole). 264 140.âRCS-8 (1-(2-Cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2 265 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 266 141.âWIN55,212-2 ((R)-(+)-[2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4 267 morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1 268 naphthalenylmethanone). 269 142.âWIN55,212-3 ([(3S)-2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4 270 morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1 271 naphthalenylmethanone). 272 143.âPentedrone (alpha-Methylaminovalerophenone). 273 144.âFluoroamphetamine. 274 145.âFluoromethamphetamine. 275 146.âMethoxetamine. 276 147.âMethiopropamine. 277 148.âMethylbuphedrone (Methyl-alpha 278 methylaminobutyrophenone). 279 149.âAPB ((2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran). 280 150.âAPDB ((2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran). 281 151.âUR-144 (1-Pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3 282 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 283 152.âXLR11 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3 284 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 285 153.âChloro UR-144 (1-(Chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3 286 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 287 154.âAKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 288 155.âAM-2233(1-[(N-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2 289 iodobenzoyl)indole). 290 156.âSTS-135 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3 291 carboxamide). 292 157.âURB-597 ((3â²-(Aminocarbonyl)[1,1â²-biphenyl]-3-yl) 293 cyclohexylcarbamate). 294 158.âURB-602 ([1,1â²-Biphenyl]-3-yl-carbamic acid, 295 cyclohexyl ester). 296 159.âURB-754 (6-Methyl-2-[(4-methylphenyl)amino]-1 297 benzoxazin-4-one). 298 160.â2C-D (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 299 161.â2C-H (2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine). 300 162.â2C-N (4-Nitro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 301 163.â2C-P (4-(n)-Propyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 302 164.â25I-NBOMe (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 303 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 304 165.âMDMA (3,4-Methylenedioxymethamphetamine). 305 166.âPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxylate). 306 167.âFluoro PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3 307 carboxylate). 308 168.âBB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indole-3 309 carboxylate). 310 169.âFluoro AKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole 311 3-carboxamide). 312 170.âAB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 313 pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 314 171.âAB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 315 (4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 316 172.âADB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl) 317 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 318 173.âFluoro ADBICA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2 319 yl)-1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide). 320 174.â25B-NBOMe (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 321 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 322 175.â25C-NBOMe (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 323 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 324 176.âAB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 325 (cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 326 177.âFUB-PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indole-3 327 carboxylate). 328 178.âFluoro-NNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(fluoropentyl)indole 329 3-carboxamide). 330 179.âFluoro-AMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 331 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 332 180.âTHJ-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indazole). 333 181.âAM-855 ((4aR,12bR)-8-Hexyl-2,5,5-trimethyl 334 1,4,4a,8,9,10,11,12b-octahydronaphtho[3,2-c]isochromen-12-ol). 335 182.âAM-905 ((6aR,9R,10aR)-3-[(E)-Hept-1-enyl]-9 336 (hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-6a,7,8,9,10,10a 337 hexahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol). 338 183.âAM-906 ((6aR,9R,10aR)-3-[(Z)-Hept-1-enyl]-9 339 (hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-6a,7,8,9,10,10a 340 hexahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol). 341 184.âAM-2389 ((6aR,9R,10aR)-3-(1-Hexyl-cyclobut-1-yl) 342 6a,7,8,9,10,10a-hexahydro-6,6-dimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-1,9 343 diol). 344 185.âHU-243 ((6aR,8S,9S,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6 345 dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-8,9-ditritio-7,8,10,10a 346 tetrahydro-6aH-benzo[c]chromen-1-ol). 347 186.âHU-336 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-pentyl 348 6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydro-1H-benzo[c]chromene-1,4(6H)-dione). 349 187.âMAPB ((2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran). 350 188.â5-IT (2-(1H-Indol-5-yl)-1-methyl-ethylamine). 351 189.â6-IT (2-(1H-Indol-6-yl)-1-methyl-ethylamine). 352 190.âSynthetic Cannabinoids.âUnless specifically excepted 353 or unless listed in another schedule or contained within a 354 pharmaceutical product approved by the United States Food and 355 Drug Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or 356 preparation that contains any quantity of a synthetic 357 cannabinoid found to be in any of the following chemical class 358 descriptions, or homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs, 359 isomers (including optical, positional, or geometric), esters, 360 ethers, salts, and salts of homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic 361 analogs, isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence of 362 such homologues, nitrogen-heterocyclic analogs, isomers, esters, 363 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, or ethers is 364 possible within the specific chemical class or designation. 365 Since nomenclature of these synthetically produced cannabinoids 366 is not internationally standardized and may continually evolve, 367 these structures or the compounds of these structures shall be 368 included under this subparagraph, regardless of their specific 369 numerical designation of atomic positions covered, if it can be 370 determined through a recognized method of scientific testing or 371 analysis that the substance contains properties that fit within 372 one or more of the following categories: 373 a.âTetrahydrocannabinols.âAny tetrahydrocannabinols 374 naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis, the 375 synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant 376 or in the resinous extracts of the genus Cannabis, or synthetic 377 substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical 378 structure and pharmacological activity, including, but not 379 limited to, Delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinols and their optical 380 isomers, Delta 8 tetrahydrocannabinols and their optical 381 isomers, Delta 6a,10a tetrahydrocannabinols and their optical 382 isomers, or any compound containing a tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene 383 structure with substitution at either or both the 3-position or 384 9-position, with or without substitution at the 1-position with 385 hydroxyl or alkoxy groups, including, but not limited to: 386 (I)âTetrahydrocannabinol. 387 (II)âHU-210 ((6aR,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3 388 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1 389 ol). 390 (III)âHU-211 ((6aS,10aS)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3 391 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1 392 ol). 393 (IV)âJWH-051 ((6aR,10aR)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3 394 (2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene). 395 (V)âJWH-133 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-(2-methylpentan 396 2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene). 397 (VI)âJWH-057 ((6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-Trimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan 398 2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene). 399 (VII)âJWH-359 ((6aR,10aR)-1-Methoxy-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-(2,3 400 dimethylpentan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromene). 401 (VIII)âAM-087 ((6aR,10aR)-3-(2-Methyl-6-bromohex-2-yl) 402 6,6,9-trimethyl-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol). 403 (IX)âAM-411 ((6aR,10aR)-3-(1-Adamantyl)-6,6,9-trimethyl 404 6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol). 405 (X)âParahexyl. 406 b.âNaphthoylindoles, Naphthoylindazoles, 407 Naphthoylcarbazoles, Naphthylmethylindoles, 408 Naphthylmethylindazoles, and Naphthylmethylcarbazoles.âAny 409 compound containing a naphthoylindole, naphthoylindazole, 410 naphthoylcarbazole, naphthylmethylindole, 411 naphthylmethylindazole, or naphthylmethylcarbazole structure, 412 with or without substitution on the indole, indazole, or 413 carbazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the 414 naphthyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to: 415 (I)âJWH-007 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 416 (II)âJWH-011 (1-(1-Methylhexyl)-2-methyl-3-(1 417 naphthoyl)indole). 418 (III)âJWH-015 (1-Propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 419 (IV)âJWH-016 (1-Butyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 420 (V)âJWH-018 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 421 (VI)âJWH-019 (1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 422 (VII)âJWH-020 (1-Heptyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 423 (VIII)âJWH-022 (1-(4-Pentenyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 424 (IX)âJWH-071 (1-Ethyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 425 (X)âJWH-072 (1-Propyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 426 (XI)âJWH-073 (1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 427 (XII)âJWH-080 (1-Butyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole). 428 (XIII)âJWH-081 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole). 429 (XIV)âJWH-098 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1 430 naphthoyl)indole). 431 (XV)âJWH-116 (1-Pentyl-2-ethyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 432 (XVI)âJWH-122 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole). 433 (XVII)âJWH-149 (1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methyl-1 434 naphthoyl)indole). 435 (XVIII)âJWH-164 (1-Pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole). 436 (XIX)âJWH-175 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthylmethyl)indole). 437 (XX)âJWH-180 (1-Propyl-3-(4-propyl-1-naphthoyl)indole). 438 (XXI)âJWH-182 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-propyl-1-naphthoyl)indole). 439 (XXII)âJWH-184 (1-Pentyl-3-[(4-methyl)-1 440 naphthylmethyl]indole). 441 (XXIII)âJWH-193 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(4-methyl-1 442 naphthoyl)indole). 443 (XXIV)âJWH-198 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(4-methoxy-1 444 naphthoyl)indole). 445 (XXV)âJWH-200 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1 446 naphthoyl)indole). 447 (XXVI)âJWH-210 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole). 448 (XXVII)âJWH-387 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-bromo-1-naphthoyl)indole). 449 (XXVIII)âJWH-398 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole). 450 (XXIX)âJWH-412 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)indole). 451 (XXX)âJWH-424 (1-Pentyl-3-(8-bromo-1-naphthoyl)indole). 452 (XXXI)âAM-1220 (1-[(1-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(1 453 naphthoyl)indole). 454 (XXXII)âAM-1235 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-6-nitro-3-(1 455 naphthoyl)indole). 456 (XXXIII)âAM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1 457 naphthoyl)indole). 458 (XXXIV)âChloro JWH-018 (1-(Chloropentyl)-3-(1 459 naphthoyl)indole). 460 (XXXV)âBromo JWH-018 (1-(Bromopentyl)-3-(1 461 naphthoyl)indole). 462 (XXXVI)âAM-2232 (1-(4-Cyanobutyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole). 463 (XXXVII)âTHJ-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1 464 naphthoyl)indazole). 465 (XXXVIII)âMAM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1 466 naphthoyl)indole). 467 (XXXIX)âEAM-2201 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(4-ethyl-1 468 naphthoyl)indole). 469 (XL)âEG-018 (9-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)carbazole). 470 (XLI)âEG-2201 (9-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(1 471 naphthoyl)carbazole). 472 c.âNaphthoylpyrroles.âAny compound containing a 473 naphthoylpyrrole structure, with or without substitution on the 474 pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the 475 naphthyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to: 476 (I)âJWH-030 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole). 477 (II)âJWH-031 (1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole). 478 (III)âJWH-145 (1-Pentyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole). 479 (IV)âJWH-146 (1-Heptyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole). 480 (V)âJWH-147 (1-Hexyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole). 481 (VI)âJWH-307 (1-Pentyl-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-3-(1 482 naphthoyl)pyrrole). 483 (VII)âJWH-309 (1-Pentyl-5-(1-naphthalenyl)-3-(1 484 naphthoyl)pyrrole). 485 (VIII)âJWH-368 (1-Pentyl-5-(3-fluorophenyl)-3-(1 486 naphthoyl)pyrrole). 487 (IX)âJWH-369 (1-Pentyl-5-(2-chlorophenyl)-3-(1 488 naphthoyl)pyrrole). 489 (X)âJWH-370 (1-Pentyl-5-(2-methylphenyl)-3-(1 490 naphthoyl)pyrrole). 491 d.âNaphthylmethylenindenes.âAny compound containing a 492 naphthylmethylenindene structure, with or without substitution 493 at the 3-position of the indene ring to any extent, whether or 494 not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any extent, including, 495 but not limited to, JWH-176 (3-Pentyl-1 496 (naphthylmethylene)indene). 497 e.âPhenylacetylindoles and Phenylacetylindazoles.âAny 498 compound containing a phenylacetylindole or phenylacetylindazole 499 structure, with or without substitution on the indole or 500 indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the 501 phenyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to: 502 (I)âJWH-167 (1-Pentyl-3-(phenylacetyl)indole). 503 (II)âJWH-201 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 504 (III)âJWH-203 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole). 505 (IV)âJWH-250 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 506 (V)âJWH-251 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole). 507 (VI)âJWH-302 (1-Pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 508 (VII)âCannabipiperidiethanone. 509 (VIII)âRCS-8 (1-(2-Cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2 510 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole). 511 f.âCyclohexylphenols.âAny compound containing a 512 cyclohexylphenol structure, with or without substitution at the 513 5-position of the phenolic ring to any extent, whether or not 514 substituted on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent, including, but 515 not limited to: 516 (I)âCP 47,497 (2-(3-Hydroxycyclohexyl)-5-(2-methyloctan-2 517 yl)phenol). 518 (II)âCannabicyclohexanol (CP 47,497 dimethyloctyl (C8) 519 homologue). 520 (III)âCP-55,940 (2-(3-Hydroxy-6-propanol-cyclohexyl)-5-(2 521 methyloctan-2-yl)phenol). 522 g.âBenzoylindoles and Benzoylindazoles.âAny compound 523 containing a benzoylindole or benzoylindazole structure, with or 524 without substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any 525 extent, whether or not substituted on the phenyl ring to any 526 extent, including, but not limited to: 527 (I)âAM-679 (1-Pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole). 528 (II)âAM-694 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole). 529 (III)âAM-1241 (1-[(N-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2 530 iodo-5-nitrobenzoyl)indole). 531 (IV)âPravadoline (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-3-(4 532 methoxybenzoyl)indole). 533 (V)âAM-2233 (1-[(N-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2 534 iodobenzoyl)indole). 535 (VI)âRCS-4 (1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole). 536 (VII)âRCS-4 C4 homologue (1-Butyl-3-(4 537 methoxybenzoyl)indole). 538 (VIII)âAM-630 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-6-iodo 539 3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole). 540 h.âTetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles and 541 Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindazoles.âAny compound containing a 542 tetramethylcyclopropanoylindole or 543 tetramethylcyclopropanoylindazole structure, with or without 544 substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any extent, 545 whether or not substituted on the tetramethylcyclopropyl group 546 to any extent, including, but not limited to: 547 (I)âUR-144 (1-Pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3 548 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 549 (II)âXLR11 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3 550 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 551 (III)âChloro UR-144 (1-(Chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3 552 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 553 (IV)âA-796,260 (1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(2,2,3,3 554 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 555 (V)âA-834,735 (1-[4-(Tetrahydropyranyl)methyl]-3-(2,2,3,3 556 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 557 (VI)âM-144 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-2-methyl-3-(2,2,3,3 558 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 559 (VII)âFUB-144 (1-(4-Fluorobenzyl)-3-(2,2,3,3 560 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 561 (VIII)âFAB-144 (1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3 562 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indazole). 563 (IX)âXLR12 (1-(4,4,4-Trifluorobutyl)-3-(2,2,3,3 564 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 565 (X)âAB-005 (1-[(1-Methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2,2,3,3 566 tetramethylcyclopropanoyl)indole). 567 i.âAdamantoylindoles, Adamantoylindazoles, Adamantylindole 568 carboxamides, and Adamantylindazole carboxamides.âAny compound 569 containing an adamantoyl indole, adamantoyl indazole, adamantyl 570 indole carboxamide, or adamantyl indazole carboxamide structure, 571 with or without substitution on the indole or indazole ring to 572 any extent, whether or not substituted on the adamantyl ring to 573 any extent, including, but not limited to: 574 (I)âAKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 575 (II)âFluoro AKB48 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole 576 3-carboxamide). 577 (III)âSTS-135 (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3 578 carboxamide). 579 (IV)âAM-1248 (1-(1-Methylpiperidine)methyl-3-(1 580 adamantoyl)indole). 581 (V)âAB-001 (1-Pentyl-3-(1-adamantoyl)indole). 582 (VI)âAPICA (N-Adamant-1-yl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxamide). 583 (VII)âFluoro AB-001 (1-(Fluoropentyl)-3-(1 584 adamantoyl)indole). 585 j.âQuinolinylindolecarboxylates, 586 Quinolinylindazolecarboxylates, Quinolinylindolecarboxamides, 587 and Quinolinylindazolecarboxamides.âAny compound containing a 588 quinolinylindole carboxylate, quinolinylindazole carboxylate, 589 isoquinolinylindole carboxylate, isoquinolinylindazole 590 carboxylate, quinolinylindole carboxamide, quinolinylindazole 591 carboxamide, isoquinolinylindole carboxamide, or 592 isoquinolinylindazole carboxamide structure, with or without 593 substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any extent, 594 whether or not substituted on the quinoline or isoquinoline ring 595 to any extent, including, but not limited to: 596 (I)âPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxylate). 597 (II)âFluoro PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3 598 carboxylate). 599 (III)âBB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indole-3 600 carboxylate). 601 (IV)âFUB-PB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indole-3 602 carboxylate). 603 (V)âNPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxylate). 604 (VI)âFluoro NPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole 605 3-carboxylate). 606 (VII)âFUB-NPB-22 (8-Quinolinyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indazole 607 3-carboxylate). 608 (VIII)âTHJ (8-Quinolinyl 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 609 (IX)âFluoro THJ (8-Quinolinyl 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-3 610 carboxamide). 611 k.âNaphthylindolecarboxylates and 612 Naphthylindazolecarboxylates.âAny compound containing a 613 naphthylindole carboxylate or naphthylindazole carboxylate 614 structure, with or without substitution on the indole or 615 indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the 616 naphthyl ring to any extent, including, but not limited to: 617 (I)âNM-2201 (1-Naphthalenyl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)indole-3 618 carboxylate). 619 (II)âSDB-005 (1-Naphthalenyl 1-pentylindazole-3 620 carboxylate). 621 (III)âFluoro SDB-005 (1-Naphthalenyl 1 622 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxylate). 623 (IV)âFDU-PB-22 (1-Naphthalenyl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indole-3 624 carboxylate). 625 (V)â3-CAF (2-Naphthalenyl 1-(2-fluorophenyl)indazole-3 626 carboxylate). 627 l.âNaphthylindole carboxamides and Naphthylindazole 628 carboxamides.âAny compound containing a naphthylindole 629 carboxamide or naphthylindazole carboxamide structure, with or 630 without substitution on the indole or indazole ring to any 631 extent, whether or not substituted on the naphthyl ring to any 632 extent, including, but not limited to: 633 (I)âNNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentylindole-3-carboxamide). 634 (II)âFluoro-NNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(fluoropentyl)indole 635 3-carboxamide). 636 (III)âChloro-NNEI (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1 637 (chloropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide). 638 (IV)âMN-18 (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1-pentylindazole-3 639 carboxamide). 640 (V)âFluoro MN-18 (N-Naphthalen-1-yl 1 641 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 642 m.âAlkylcarbonyl indole carboxamides, Alkylcarbonyl 643 indazole carboxamides, Alkylcarbonyl indole carboxylates, and 644 Alkylcarbonyl indazole carboxylates.âAny compound containing an 645 alkylcarbonyl group, including 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 646 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-1-oxo-3 647 phenylpropan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl, with an 648 indole carboxamide, indazole carboxamide, indole carboxylate, or 649 indazole carboxylate, with or without substitution on the indole 650 or indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on 651 the alkylcarbonyl group to any extent, including, but not 652 limited to: 653 (I)âADBICA, (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 654 pentylindole-3-carboxamide). 655 (II)âFluoro ADBICA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2 656 yl)-1-(fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide). 657 (III)âFluoro ABICA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 658 (fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide). 659 (IV)âAB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 660 pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 661 (V)âFluoro AB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl) 662 1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 663 (VI)âADB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl) 664 1-pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 665 (VII)âFluoro ADB-PINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1 666 oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 667 (VIII)âAB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 668 (4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 669 (IX)âADB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2 670 yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 671 (X)âAB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 672 (cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 673 (XI)âMA-CHMINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 674 (cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 675 (XII)âMAB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2 676 yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 677 (XIII)âAMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 678 pentylindazole-3-carboxamide). 679 (XIV)âFluoro-AMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1 680 (fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 681 (XV)âFUB-AMB (N-(1-Methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4 682 fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 683 (XVI)âMDMB-CHMINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan 684 2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 685 (XVII)âMDMB-FUBINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan 686 2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 687 (XVIII)âMDMB-CHMICA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan 688 2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indole-3-carboxamide). 689 (XIX)âPX-1 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-(5 690 fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide). 691 (XX)âPX-2 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-(5 692 fluoropentyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 693 (XXI)âPX-3 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 694 (cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 695 (XXII)âPX-4 (N-(1-Amino-1-oxo-3-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-(4 696 fluorobenzyl)indazole-3-carboxamide). 697 (XXIII)âMO-CHMINACA (N-(1-Methoxy-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan 698 2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)indazole-3-carboxylate). 699 n.âCumylindolecarboxamides and Cumylindazolecarboxamides. 700 Any compound containing a N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl) indole 701 carboxamide or N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl) indazole carboxamide 702 structure, with or without substitution on the indole or 703 indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the 704 phenyl ring of the cumyl group to any extent, including, but not 705 limited to: 706 (I)âCUMYL-PICA (N-(2-Phenylpropan-2-yl)-1-pentylindole-3 707 carboxamide). 708 (II)âFluoro CUMYL-PICA (N-(2-Phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 709 (fluoropentyl)indole-3-carboxamide). 710 o.âOther Synthetic Cannabinoids.âAny material, compound, 711 mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of a 712 Synthetic Cannabinoid, as described in sub-subparagraphs a.-n.: 713 (I)âWith or without modification or replacement of a 714 carbonyl, carboxamide, alkylene, alkyl, or carboxylate linkage 715 between either two core rings, or linkage between a core ring 716 and group structure, with or without the addition of a carbon or 717 replacement of a carbon; 718 (II)âWith or without replacement of a core ring or group 719 structure, whether or not substituted on the ring or group 720 structures to any extent; and 721 (III)âIs a cannabinoid receptor agonist, unless 722 specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule or 723 contained within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United 724 States Food and Drug Administration. 725 191.âSubstituted Cathinones.âUnless specifically excepted, 726 listed in another schedule, or contained within a pharmaceutical 727 product approved by the United States Food and Drug 728 Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation, 729 including its salts, isomers, esters, or ethers, and salts of 730 isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence of such salts 731 is possible within any of the following specific chemical 732 designations: 733 a.âAny compound containing a 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone 734 structure; 735 b.âAny compound containing a 2-amino-1-naphthyl-1-propanone 736 structure; or 737 c.âAny compound containing a 2-amino-1-thiophenyl-1 738 propanone structure, 739 740 whether or not the compound is further modified: 741 (I)âWith or without substitution on the ring system to any 742 extent with alkyl, alkylthio, thio, fused alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, 743 haloalkyl, hydroxyl, nitro, fused furan, fused benzofuran, fused 744 dihydrofuran, fused tetrahydropyran, fused alkyl ring, or halide 745 substituents; 746 (II)âWith or without substitution at the 3-propanone 747 position with an alkyl substituent or removal of the methyl 748 group at the 3-propanone position; 749 (III)âWith or without substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen 750 atom with alkyl, dialkyl, acetyl, or benzyl groups, whether or 751 not further substituted in the ring system; or 752 (IV)âWith or without inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom 753 in a cyclic structure, including, but not limited to: 754 (A)âMethcathinone. 755 (B)âEthcathinone. 756 (C)âMethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone). 757 (D)â2,3-Methylenedioxymethcathinone. 758 (E)âMDPV (3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone). 759 (F)âMethylmethcathinone. 760 (G)âMethoxymethcathinone. 761 (H)âFluoromethcathinone. 762 (I)âMethylethcathinone. 763 (J)âButylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 764 methylaminobutyrophenone). 765 (K)âEthylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone). 766 (L)âBMDP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-benzylcathinone). 767 (M)âNaphyrone (Naphthylpyrovalerone). 768 (N)âBromomethcathinone. 769 (O)âBuphedrone (alpha-Methylaminobutyrophenone). 770 (P)âEutylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 771 ethylaminobutyrophenone). 772 (Q)âDimethylcathinone. 773 (R)âDimethylmethcathinone. 774 (S)âPentylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 775 methylaminovalerophenone). 776 (T)âPentedrone (alpha-Methylaminovalerophenone). 777 (U)âMDPPP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 778 pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 779 (V)âMDPBP (3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha 780 pyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 781 (W)âMPPP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 782 (X)âPPP (Pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 783 (Y)âPVP (Pyrrolidinovalerophenone) or 784 (Pyrrolidinopentiophenone). 785 (Z)âMOPPP (Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone). 786 (AA)âMPHP (Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone). 787 (BB)âF-MABP (Fluoromethylaminobutyrophenone). 788 (CC)âMe-EABP (Methylethylaminobutyrophenone). 789 (DD)âPBP (Pyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 790 (EE)âMeO-PBP (Methoxypyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 791 (FF)âEt-PBP (Ethylpyrrolidinobutyrophenone). 792 (GG)â3-Me-4-MeO-MCAT (3-Methyl-4-Methoxymethcathinone). 793 (HH)âDimethylone (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N 794 dimethylcathinone). 795 (II)â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N,N-diethylcathinone. 796 (JJ)â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylcathinone. 797 (KK)â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylmethcathinone. 798 (LL)â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-acetylethcathinone. 799 (MM)âMethylbuphedrone (Methyl-alpha 800 methylaminobutyrophenone). 801 (NN)âMethyl-alpha-methylaminohexanophenone. 802 (OO)âN-Ethyl-N-methylcathinone. 803 (PP)âPHP (Pyrrolidinohexanophenone). 804 (QQ)âPV8 (Pyrrolidinoheptanophenone). 805 (RR)âChloromethcathinone. 806 (SS)â4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-aminoacetophenone. 807 192.âSubstituted Phenethylamines.âUnless specifically 808 excepted or unless listed in another schedule, or contained 809 within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United States 810 Food and Drug Administration, any material, compound, mixture, 811 or preparation, including its salts, isomers, esters, or ethers, 812 and salts of isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence 813 of such salts is possible within any of the following specific 814 chemical designations, any compound containing a phenethylamine 815 structure, without a beta-keto group, and without a benzyl group 816 attached to the amine group, whether or not the compound is 817 further modified with or without substitution on the phenyl ring 818 to any extent with alkyl, alkylthio, nitro, alkoxy, thio, 819 halide, fused alkylenedioxy, fused furan, fused benzofuran, 820 fused dihydrofuran, or fused tetrahydropyran substituents, 821 whether or not further substituted on a ring to any extent, with 822 or without substitution at the alpha or beta position by any 823 alkyl substituent, with or without substitution at the nitrogen 824 atom, and with or without inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom 825 in a cyclic structure, including, but not limited to: 826 a.â2C-B (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 827 b.â2C-E (4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 828 c.â2C-T-4 (4-Isopropylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 829 d.â2C-C (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 830 e.â2C-T (4-Methylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 831 f.â2C-T-2 (4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 832 g.â2C-T-7 (4-(n)-Propylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 833 h.â2C-I (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 834 i.â2C-D (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 835 j.â2C-H (2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine). 836 k.â2C-N (4-Nitro-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 837 l.â2C-P (4-(n)-Propyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine). 838 m.âMDMA (3,4-Methylenedioxymethamphetamine). 839 n.âMBDB (Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine) or (3,4 840 Methylenedioxy-N-methylbutanamine). 841 o.âMDA (3,4-Methylenedioxyamphetamine). 842 p.â2,5-Dimethoxyamphetamine. 843 q.âFluoroamphetamine. 844 r.âFluoromethamphetamine. 845 s.âMDEA (3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine). 846 t.âDOB (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 847 u.âDOC (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 848 v.âDOET (4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 849 w.âDOI (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 850 x.âDOM (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine). 851 y.âPMA (4-Methoxyamphetamine). 852 z.âN-Ethylamphetamine. 853 aa.â3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-hydroxyamphetamine. 854 bb.â5-Methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine. 855 cc.âPMMA (4-Methoxymethamphetamine). 856 dd.âN,N-Dimethylamphetamine. 857 ee.â3,4,5-Trimethoxyamphetamine. 858 ff.â4-APB (4-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran). 859 gg.â5-APB (5-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran). 860 hh.â6-APB (6-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran). 861 ii.â7-APB (7-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran). 862 jj.â4-APDB (4-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran). 863 kk.â5-APDB (5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran). 864 ll.â6-APDB (6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran). 865 mm.â7-APDB (7-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran). 866 nn.â4-MAPB (4-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran). 867 oo.â5-MAPB (5-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran). 868 pp.â6-MAPB (6-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran). 869 qq.â7-MAPB (7-(2-Methylaminopropyl)benzofuran). 870 rr.â5-EAPB (5-(2-Ethylaminopropyl)benzofuran). 871 ss.â5-MAPDB (5-(2-Methylaminopropyl)-2,3 872 dihydrobenzofuran), 873 874 which does not include phenethylamine, mescaline as described in 875 subparagraph 20., substituted cathinones as described in 876 subparagraph 191., N-Benzyl phenethylamine compounds as 877 described in subparagraph 193., or methamphetamine as described 878 in subparagraph (2)(c)5. 879 193.âN-Benzyl Phenethylamine Compounds.âUnless specifically 880 excepted or unless listed in another schedule, or contained 881 within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United States 882 Food and Drug Administration, any material, compound, mixture, 883 or preparation, including its salts, isomers, esters, or ethers, 884 and salts of isomers, esters, or ethers, whenever the existence 885 of such salts is possible within any of the following specific 886 chemical designations, any compound containing a phenethylamine 887 structure without a beta-keto group, with substitution on the 888 nitrogen atom of the amino group with a benzyl substituent, with 889 or without substitution on the phenyl or benzyl ring to any 890 extent with alkyl, alkoxy, thio, alkylthio, halide, fused 891 alkylenedioxy, fused furan, fused benzofuran, or fused 892 tetrahydropyran substituents, whether or not further substituted 893 on a ring to any extent, with or without substitution at the 894 alpha position by any alkyl substituent, including, but not 895 limited to: 896 a.â25B-NBOMe (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 897 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 898 b.â25B-NBOH (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 899 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 900 c.â25B-NBF (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 901 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine). 902 d.â25B-NBMD (4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2,3 903 methylenedioxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 904 e.â25I-NBOMe (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 905 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 906 f.â25I-NBOH (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 907 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 908 g.â25I-NBF (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 909 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine). 910 h.â25I-NBMD (4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2,3 911 methylenedioxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 912 i.â25T2-NBOMe (4-Methylthio-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 913 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 914 j.â25T4-NBOMe (4-Isopropylthio-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 915 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 916 k.â25T7-NBOMe (4-(n)-Propylthio-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 917 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 918 l.â25C-NBOMe (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 919 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 920 m.â25C-NBOH (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 921 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 922 n.â25C-NBF (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 923 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine). 924 o.â25C-NBMD (4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2,3 925 methylenedioxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 926 p.â25H-NBOMe (2,5-Dimethoxy-[N-(2 927 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 928 q.â25H-NBOH (2,5-Dimethoxy-[N-(2 929 hydroxybenzyl)]phenethylamine). 930 r.â25H-NBF (2,5-Dimethoxy-[N-(2 931 fluorobenzyl)]phenethylamine). 932 s.â25D-NBOMe (4-Methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-[N-(2 933 methoxybenzyl)]phenethylamine), 934 935 which does not include substituted cathinones as described in 936 subparagraph 191. 937 194.âSubstituted Tryptamines.âUnless specifically excepted 938 or unless listed in another schedule, or contained within a 939 pharmaceutical product approved by the United States Food and 940 Drug Administration, any material, compound, mixture, or 941 preparation containing a 2-(1H-indol-3-yl)ethanamine, for 942 example tryptamine, structure with or without mono- or di 943 substitution of the amine nitrogen with alkyl or alkenyl groups, 944 or by inclusion of the amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic 945 structure, whether or not substituted at the alpha position with 946 an alkyl group, whether or not substituted on the indole ring to 947 any extent with any alkyl, alkoxy, halo, hydroxyl, or acetoxy 948 groups, including, but not limited to: 949 a.âAlpha-Ethyltryptamine. 950 b.âBufotenine. 951 c.âDET (Diethyltryptamine). 952 d.âDMT (Dimethyltryptamine). 953 e.âMET (N-Methyl-N-ethyltryptamine). 954 f.âDALT (N,N-Diallyltryptamine). 955 g.âEiPT (N-Ethyl-N-isopropyltryptamine). 956 h.âMiPT (N-Methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine). 957 i.â5-Hydroxy-AMT (5-Hydroxy-alpha-methyltryptamine). 958 j.â5-Hydroxy-N-methyltryptamine. 959 k.â5-MeO-MiPT (5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine). 960 l.â5-MeO-AMT (5-Methoxy-alpha-methyltryptamine). 961 m.âMethyltryptamine. 962 n.â5-MeO-DMT (5-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine). 963 o.â5-Me-DMT (5-Methyl-N,N-dimethyltryptamine). 964 p.â5-MeO-DiPT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine). 965 q.âDiPT (N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine). 966 r.âDPT (N,N-Dipropyltryptamine). 967 s.â4-Hydroxy-DiPT (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine). 968 t.â5-MeO-DALT (5-Methoxy-N,N-Diallyltryptamine). 969 u.â4-AcO-DMT (4-Acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine). 970 v.â4-AcO-DiPT (4-Acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine). 971 w.â4-Hydroxy-DET (4-Hydroxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine). 972 x.â4-Hydroxy-MET (4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine). 973 y.â4-Hydroxy-MiPT (4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N 974 isopropyltryptamine). 975 z.âMethyl-alpha-ethyltryptamine. 976 aa.âBromo-DALT (Bromo-N,N-diallyltryptamine), 977 978 which does not include tryptamine, psilocyn as described in 979 subparagraph 34., or psilocybin as described in subparagraph 33. 980 195.âSubstituted Phenylcyclohexylamines.âUnless 981 specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, or 982 contained within a pharmaceutical product approved by the United 983 States Food and Drug Administration, any material, compound, 984 mixture, or preparation containing a phenylcyclohexylamine 985 structure, with or without any substitution on the phenyl ring, 986 any substitution on the cyclohexyl ring, any replacement of the 987 phenyl ring with a thiophenyl or benzothiophenyl ring, with or 988 without substitution on the amine with alkyl, dialkyl, or alkoxy 989 substituents, inclusion of the nitrogen in a cyclic structure, 990 or any combination of the above, including, but not limited to: 991 a.âBTCP (Benzothiophenylcyclohexylpiperidine) or BCP 992 (Benocyclidine). 993 b.âPCE (N-Ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine)(Ethylamine analog 994 of phencyclidine). 995 c.âPCPY (N-(1-Phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine)(Pyrrolidine 996 analog of phencyclidine). 997 d.âPCPr (Phenylcyclohexylpropylamine). 998 e.âTCP (1-[1-(2-Thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine)(Thiophene 999 analog of phencyclidine). 1000 f.âPCEEA (Phenylcyclohexyl(ethoxyethylamine)). 1001 g.âPCMPA (Phenylcyclohexyl(methoxypropylamine)). 1002 h.âMethoxetamine. 1003 i.â3-Methoxy-PCE ((3-Methoxyphenyl)cyclohexylethylamine). 1004 j.âBromo-PCP ((Bromophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1005 k.âChloro-PCP ((Chlorophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1006 l.âFluoro-PCP ((Fluorophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1007 m.âHydroxy-PCP ((Hydroxyphenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1008 n.âMethoxy-PCP ((Methoxyphenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1009 o.âMethyl-PCP ((Methylphenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1010 p.âNitro-PCP ((Nitrophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1011 q.âOxo-PCP ((Oxophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1012 r.âAmino-PCP ((Aminophenyl)cyclohexylpiperidine). 1013 196.âW-15, 4-chloro-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-2 1014 piperidinylidene]-benzenesulfonamide. 1015 197.âW-18, 4-chloro-N-[1-[2-(4-nitrophenyl)ethyl]-2 1016 piperidinylidene]-benzenesulfonamide. 1017 198.âAH-7921, 3,4-dichloro-N-[[1 1018 (dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]methyl]-benzamide. 1019 199.âU47700, trans-3,4-dichloro-N-[2 1020 (dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl-benzamide. 1021 200.âMT-45, 1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)-piperazine, 1022 dihydrochloride. 1023 Section 4.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1) of section 1024 893.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1025 893.13âProhibited acts; penalties.â 1026 (1) 1027 (i)âExcept as authorized by this chapter, a person commits 1028 a felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 1029 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, and must be sentenced to a 1030 mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 3 years, if: 1031 1.âThe person sells, manufactures, or delivers, or 1032 possesses with intent to sell, manufacture, or deliver, any of 1033 the following: 1034 a.âAlfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)1.; 1035 b.âCarfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)6.; 1036 c.âFentanyl, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)9.; 1037 d.âSufentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)30.; 1038 e.âA fentanyl derivative, as described in s. 1039 893.03(1)(a)63.; 1040 f.âXylazine, as described in s. 893.03(1)(c)37.; 1041 g.f.âA controlled substance analog, as described in s. 1042 893.0356, of any substance described in sub-subparagraphs a.-f. 1043 sub-subparagraphs a.-e.; or 1044 h.g.âA mixture containing any substance described in sub 1045 subparagraphs a.-g. sub-subparagraphs a.-f.; and 1046 2.âThe substance or mixture listed in subparagraph 1. is in 1047 a form that resembles, or is mixed, granulated, absorbed, spray 1048 dried, or aerosolized as or onto, coated on, in whole or in 1049 part, or solubilized with or into, a product, when such product 1050 or its packaging further has at least one of the following 1051 attributes: 1052 a.âResembles the trade dress of a branded food product, 1053 consumer food product, or logo food product; 1054 b.âIncorporates an actual or fake registered copyright, 1055 service mark, or trademark; 1056 c.âResembles candy, cereal, a gummy, a vitamin, or a 1057 chewable product, such as a gum or gelatin-based product; or 1058 d.âContains a cartoon character imprint. 1059 Section 5.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 1060 893.135, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1061 893.135âTrafficking; mandatory sentences; suspension or 1062 reduction of sentences; conspiracy to engage in trafficking.â 1063 (1)âExcept as authorized in this chapter or in chapter 499 1064 and notwithstanding the provisions of s. 893.13: 1065 (c)1.âA person who knowingly sells, purchases, 1066 manufactures, delivers, or brings into this state, or who is 1067 knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, 4 grams or 1068 more of any morphine, opium, hydromorphone, or any salt, 1069 derivative, isomer, or salt of an isomer thereof, including 1070 heroin, as described in s. 893.03(1)(b), (2)(a), (3)(c)3., or 1071 (3)(c)4., or 4 grams or more of any mixture containing any such 1072 substance, but less than 30 kilograms of such substance or 1073 mixture, commits a felony of the first degree, which felony 1074 shall be known as âtrafficking in illegal drugs,â punishable as 1075 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the 1076 quantity involved: 1077 a.âIs 4 grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such person 1078 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment 1079 of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $50,000. 1080 b.âIs 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, such person 1081 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment 1082 of 15 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $100,000. 1083 c.âIs 28 grams or more, but less than 30 kilograms, such 1084 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1085 imprisonment of 25 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1086 $500,000. 1087 2.âA person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures, 1088 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in 1089 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of 1090 hydrocodone, as described in s. 893.03(2)(a)1.k., codeine, as 1091 described in s. 893.03(2)(a)1.g., or any salt thereof, or 28 1092 grams or more of any mixture containing any such substance, 1093 commits a felony of the first degree, which felony shall be 1094 known as âtrafficking in hydrocodone,â punishable as provided in 1095 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the quantity involved: 1096 a.âIs 28 grams or more, but less than 50 grams, such person 1097 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment 1098 of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $50,000. 1099 b.âIs 50 grams or more, but less than 100 grams, such 1100 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1101 imprisonment of 7 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1102 $100,000. 1103 c.âIs 100 grams or more, but less than 300 grams, such 1104 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1105 imprisonment of 15 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1106 $500,000. 1107 d.âIs 300 grams or more, but less than 30 kilograms, such 1108 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1109 imprisonment of 25 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1110 $750,000. 1111 3.âA person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures, 1112 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in 1113 actual or constructive possession of, 7 grams or more of 1114 oxycodone, as described in s. 893.03(2)(a)1.q., or any salt 1115 thereof, or 7 grams or more of any mixture containing any such 1116 substance, commits a felony of the first degree, which felony 1117 shall be known as âtrafficking in oxycodone,â punishable as 1118 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the 1119 quantity involved: 1120 a.âIs 7 grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such person 1121 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment 1122 of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $50,000. 1123 b.âIs 14 grams or more, but less than 25 grams, such person 1124 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment 1125 of 7 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $100,000. 1126 c.âIs 25 grams or more, but less than 100 grams, such 1127 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1128 imprisonment of 15 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1129 $500,000. 1130 d.âIs 100 grams or more, but less than 30 kilograms, such 1131 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1132 imprisonment of 25 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1133 $750,000. 1134 4.a.âA person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures, 1135 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in 1136 actual or constructive possession of, 4 grams or more of: 1137 (I)âAlfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)1.; 1138 (II)âCarfentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)6.; 1139 (III)âFentanyl, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)9.; 1140 (IV)âSufentanil, as described in s. 893.03(2)(b)30.; 1141 (V)âA fentanyl derivative, as described in s. 1142 893.03(1)(a)63.; 1143 (VI)âA controlled substance analog, as described in s. 1144 893.0356, of any substance described in sub-sub-subparagraphs 1145 (I)-(V); or 1146 (VII)âA mixture containing any substance described in sub 1147 sub-subparagraphs (I)-(VI), 1148 1149 commits a felony of the first degree, which felony shall be 1150 known as âtrafficking in dangerous fentanyl or fentanyl 1151 analogues,â punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or 1152 s. 775.084. 1153 b.âIf the quantity involved under sub-subparagraph a.: 1154 (I)âIs 4 grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such person 1155 shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment 1156 of 7 years, and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $50,000. 1157 (II)âIs 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, such 1158 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1159 imprisonment of 20 years, and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1160 $100,000. 1161 (III)âIs 28 grams or more, such person shall be sentenced 1162 to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 25 years, and 1163 shall be ordered to pay a fine of $500,000. 1164 c.âA person 18 years of age or older who violates sub 1165 subparagraph a. by knowingly selling or delivering to a minor at 1166 least 4 grams of a substance or mixture listed in sub 1167 subparagraph a. shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term 1168 of not less than 25 years and not exceeding life imprisonment, 1169 and shall be ordered to pay a fine of $1 million if the 1170 substance or mixture listed in sub-subparagraph a. is in a form 1171 that resembles, or is mixed, granulated, absorbed, spray-dried, 1172 or aerosolized as or onto, coated on, in whole or in part, or 1173 solubilized with or into, a product, when such product or its 1174 packaging further has at least one of the following attributes: 1175 (I)âResembles the trade dress of a branded food product, 1176 consumer food product, or logo food product; 1177 (II)âIncorporates an actual or fake registered copyright, 1178 service mark, or trademark; 1179 (III)âResembles candy, cereal, a gummy, a vitamin, or a 1180 chewable product, such as a gum or gelatin-based product; or 1181 (IV)âContains a cartoon character imprint. 1182 5.âA person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures, 1183 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in 1184 actual or constructive possession of, 30 kilograms or more of 1185 any morphine, opium, oxycodone, hydrocodone, codeine, 1186 hydromorphone, or any salt, derivative, isomer, or salt of an 1187 isomer thereof, including heroin, as described in s. 1188 893.03(1)(b), (2)(a), (3)(c)3., or (3)(c)4., or 30 kilograms or 1189 more of any mixture containing any such substance, commits the 1190 first degree felony of trafficking in illegal drugs. A person 1191 who has been convicted of the first degree felony of trafficking 1192 in illegal drugs under this subparagraph shall be punished by 1193 life imprisonment and is ineligible for any form of 1194 discretionary early release except pardon or executive clemency 1195 or conditional medical release under s. 947.149. However, if the 1196 court determines that, in addition to committing any act 1197 specified in this paragraph: 1198 a.âThe person intentionally killed an individual or 1199 counseled, commanded, induced, procured, or caused the 1200 intentional killing of an individual and such killing was the 1201 result; or 1202 b.âThe personâs conduct in committing that act led to a 1203 natural, though not inevitable, lethal result, 1204 1205 such person commits the capital felony of trafficking in illegal 1206 drugs, punishable as provided in ss. 775.082 and 921.142. A 1207 person sentenced for a capital felony under this paragraph shall 1208 also be sentenced to pay the maximum fine provided under 1209 subparagraph 1. 1210 6.âA person who knowingly brings into this state 60 1211 kilograms or more of any morphine, opium, oxycodone, 1212 hydrocodone, codeine, hydromorphone, or any salt, derivative, 1213 isomer, or salt of an isomer thereof, including heroin, as 1214 described in s. 893.03(1)(b), (2)(a), (3)(c)3., or (3)(c)4., or 1215 60 kilograms or more of any mixture containing any such 1216 substance, and who knows that the probable result of such 1217 importation would be the death of a person, commits capital 1218 importation of illegal drugs, a capital felony punishable as 1219 provided in ss. 775.082 and 921.142. A person sentenced for a 1220 capital felony under this paragraph shall also be sentenced to 1221 pay the maximum fine provided under subparagraph 1. 1222 7.âA person who knowingly sells, purchases, manufactures, 1223 delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in 1224 actual or constructive possession of, 28 grams or more of 1225 xylazine, as described in s. 893.03(1)(c)37., or any salt 1226 thereof, or 28 grams or more of any mixture containing any such 1227 substance, commits a felony of the first degree, which felony 1228 shall be known as âtrafficking in xylazine,â punishable as 1229 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. If the 1230 quantity involved: 1231 a.âIs 28 grams or more, but less than 100 grams, such 1232 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1233 imprisonment of 3 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1234 $50,000. 1235 b.âIs 100 grams or more, but less than 200 grams, such 1236 person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of 1237 imprisonment of 7 years and shall be ordered to pay a fine of 1238 $100,000. 1239 c.âIs 200 grams or more, such person shall be sentenced to 1240 a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 25 years and shall 1241 be ordered to pay a fine of $500,000. 1242 Section 6.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 1243 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 1244 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect October 1, 1245 2026.